Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 6
IMPROVEMENT DISTRICTS IN MUNICIPALITIES (1949 ACT)

Cross references:

For public improvement districts, see article 20 of title 30.

Law reviews:

For article, "Improvement Districts for

C

olorado

C

ounties, Cities, and Towns", see 30 Colo. Law. 53 (Jan. 2001).

31-25-601. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby declares that the organization of public improvement districts, having the purposes and powers provided in this part 6, will serve a public use and will promote the health, safety, prosperity, security, and general welfare of the inhabitants of said districts.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1201, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-25-601 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-25-602. Definitions.

As used in this part 6, unless the context otherwise requires:

"District" means an improvement district that is a taxing unit and that may be created by any municipality in this state for the purpose of acquiring, constructing, installing, operating, or maintaining any public improvement or for the purpose of providing any service so long as the municipality that forms the district is authorized to perform such service or provide such improvement under the municipality's home rule charter, if any, or the laws of this state. "Public improvement" or "service" shall not include any facility identified in section 30-20-101 (8) or (9), C.R.S., nor shall the terms include services identified in section 30-15-401 (4) to (7.7), C.R.S., unless the district provides such services consistent with part 4 of article 15 of title 30, C.R.S. No such improvement or facility shall duplicate or interfere with any municipal improvement already constructed or planned to be constructed within the limits of such district.

"Elector of a district" means a person who, at the designated time or event, is qualified to register to vote in general elections in this state and:

Has been a resident of the district or of the area to be included in the district for not less than thirty days; or

Owns, or whose spouse owns, taxable real or personal property within the district or within the area to be included within the district, whether the person resides within the district or not.

Where the owner of taxable real or personal property specified in subparagraph (II) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) is not a natural person, an "elector of a district" shall include a natural person designated by such owner to vote for such person. Such designation shall be in writing and filed with the clerk of the municipality. Only one such person may be designated by an owner.

"Net effective interest rate" of a proposed issue of bonds means the net interest cost of said issue divided by the sum of the products derived by multiplying the principal amount of such issue maturing on each maturity date by the number of years from the date of said proposed bonds to their respective maturities.

"Publication", if no manner is specified therefor, means publication once a week in three consecutive weekly editions of a newspaper of general circulation in the district. It shall not be necessary that publication be made on the same day of the week in each of the three weeks; but not less than fourteen days, excluding the day of first publication, shall intervene between the first publication and the last publication, and publication shall be complete on the date of the last publication.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1202, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 84:

(1) amended, p. 839, § 2, effective March 29.

L. 92:

(2) amended, p. 2180, § 45, effective June 2.

L. 94:

(2)(a) amended, p. 1775, § 44, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 99:

(1) amended, p. 518, § 18, effective April 30.

L. 2002:

(2) amended, p. 277, § 18, effective August 7.

Editor's note:

The provisions of this section are similar to provisions of several former sections as they existed prior to 1975. For a detailed comparison, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

31-25-603. Authority of governing body.

The governing body of a municipality is hereby vested with jurisdiction, power, and authority to establish districts within the municipality in which the improvement is to be acquired, constructed, installed, operated, or maintained or the service is to be provided. The governing body of a municipality may establish a district partially within the boundaries of any other municipality or within the unincorporated territory of a county if such municipality or county consents by resolution to the establishment of such district. No such district may provide the same improvement or service as an existing special district within the territory of such existing special district unless the existing special district consents.

If a municipality other than the municipality that established the district annexes or incorporates any territory within an established district, such territory shall remain in the district unless the municipality notifies the district's board of the municipality's intent to exclude the territory annexed or incorporated from the district. If the municipality notifies the board of its intent to exclude such territory, such exclusion shall take effect January 1 of the year following such notice. Any property excluded from the district under this subsection (2) shall remain subject to payment of its share of any indebtedness or bonds that are outstanding on the date of such exclusion.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1202, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 84:

Entire section amended, p. 840, § 3, effective March 29.

L. 99:

Entire section amended, p. 519, § 19, effective April 30.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-25-603 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-25-604. Organization petition - contents.

The organization of a district shall be initiated by a petition filed in the office of the clerk of the governing body vested with jurisdiction. The petition shall be signed by not less than thirty percent or two hundred of the electors of the proposed district, whichever is less. After the filing of a petition, no signer shall be permitted to withdraw his or her name from the petition.

The petition shall set forth:

The name of the proposed district, which shall include the name of the municipality creating the district, a descriptive name or number, and the words "general improvement district";

A general description of the improvements to be acquired, constructed, installed, operated, or maintained or the services to be provided within and for the district;

The estimated cost of the proposed improvements or the estimated annual cost of providing the proposed services;

A general description of the boundaries of the district or the territory to be included therein with such certainty as to enable a property owner to determine whether or not his or her property is within the district;

The names of three persons of the district who shall represent the petitioners and who have the power to enter into agreements relating to the organization of the district, which agreements shall be binding on the district, if created;

A request for the organization of the district; and

A statement that either:

The boundaries of the proposed district include at least one hundred electors of the district;

The boundaries of the proposed district include at least one elector of the district for each five acres of land included within the proposed district; or

The petition is signed by one hundred percent of the owners of taxable real property to be included in the proposed district.

No petition with the requisite signatures shall be declared void on account of alleged defects. The governing body, at any time, may permit the petition to be amended to conform to the facts by correcting any errors in the description of the territory or in any other particular. Similar petitions or duplicate copies of the same petition for the organization of the same district may be filed and together shall be regarded as one petition. All such petitions filed prior to the hearing on the first petition filed shall be considered by the governing body the same as though included with the first petition placed on file.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1202, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 84:

(2)(b) amended, p. 840, § 4, effective March 29.

L. 99:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 519, § 20, effective April 30.

L. 2002:

(2)(e) amended, p. 277, § 19, effective August 7.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-25-604 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-25-605. Bond of petitioners.

At the time of filing the petition or at any time prior to the time of hearing on said petition, a bond shall be filed, with security approved by the governing body, or a cash deposit made sufficient to pay all expenses connected with the proceedings in case the organization of the district is not effected. If at any time during the organization proceedings the governing body is satisfied that the bond first executed or the amount of cash deposited is insufficient in amount, it may require the execution of an additional bond or the deposit of additional cash within a time to be fixed, not less than ten days thereafter, and, upon failure of the petitioners to file or deposit the same, the petition shall be dismissed.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1203, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-25-605 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-25-606. Notice of hearing.

Except as provided in section 31-25-607 (3.5), as soon as possible after the filing of such petition, the governing body shall fix by order a place and time, not less than twenty days nor more than forty days after the petition is filed, for a hearing thereon. Thereupon the clerk of the governing body shall cause notice by publication to be made of the pendency of the petition, of the purposes and boundaries of the proposed district, and of the time and place of hearing thereon. The clerk shall also cause a copy of said notice to be mailed to each elector of the district at the elector's last-known address, as disclosed by the tax and official voter registration records of the counties in which said district is proposed to be located.

No member of a governing body shall be disqualified to perform any duty imposed by this part 6 by reason of ownership of property within any proposed district.

The notice of hearing on the petition shall set forth the fact that all the property in the district is subject to the lien of the indebtedness, if any, and shall set forth the amount of the proposed indebtedness, if any.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1203, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 84:

(1) amended, p. 840, § 5, effective March 29.

L. 99:

(1) and (3) amended, p. 520, § 21, effective April 30.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-25-606 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-25-607. Hearing - dismissal - findings - declaration - when action barred.

On the day fixed for such hearing or at any adjournment thereof or, if the hearing is waived under subsection (3.5) of this section, at any meeting at which an ordinance creating a district is considered, the governing body shall ascertain from the tax rolls of the counties in which the district is located, from the last official registration list and from such other evidence which may be adduced, the total number of electors of the district and the total valuation for assessment of the real and personal property therein.

If it appears that said petition is not signed by at least the number of electors required under section 31-25-604 (1) or if it is shown that the proposed improvement or service will not confer a general benefit on the district or that the cost of the improvement or service would be excessive as compared with the value of the property in the district, the governing body shall dismiss the petition and adjudge the cost against those executing the bond filed to pay such costs. No appeal or other remedy shall lie from an order dismissing said proceeding. Nothing in this section shall prevent the filing of subsequent petitions for similar improvements or services or for a similar district. The right so to renew such proceeding is hereby expressly granted and authorized.

The finding of the governing body upon the question of the genuineness of the signatures and all matters of fact incident to such determination shall be final and conclusive on all parties in interest, whether appearing or not.

(3.5) If the petition for organizing a district is signed by one hundred percent of the owners of taxable real property to be included in the district and contains a request for such waiver, the governing body may, at its discretion, waive all or any of the requirements for notice, publication, and a hearing set forth in this section and in section 31-25-606.

Upon the hearing if required, or without a hearing pursuant to subsection (3.5) of this section, if it appears that a petition for the organization of a district has been duly signed and presented in conformity with this part 6 and that the allegations of the petition are true, the governing body, by ordinance duly adopted and made effective, shall adjudicate all questions of jurisdiction and may order that the question of the organization of the district and such other matters as the governing body deems appropriate including, but not limited to, the issuance of bonds or other matters for which voter approval is required under section 20 of article X of the Colorado constitution, be submitted to the electors at an election to be held for that purpose in accordance with the provisions of articles 1 to 13 of title 1, C.R.S., or article 10 of this title. Unless provided otherwise in section 20 of article X of the Colorado constitution, such election may be held either at a special election held not less than sixty days but not more than one hundred eighty days after the governing body adopts the ordinance or in conjunction with a regular municipal election, general election, ballot issue, or ballot question election.

At an election held under paragraph (a) of this subsection (4), the electors of the district shall vote for or against the organization of the district and such other matters as the governing body deems appropriate including, but not limited to, the issuance of bonds or matters for which voter approval is required under section 20 of article X of the Colorado constitution. If a majority of the votes cast at the election are in favor of the organization, the governing body shall adopt an ordinance declaring the district organized.

If a petition filed with the governing body complies with subsection (3.5) of this section, the governing body may adopt an ordinance declaring the district organized without any notice, hearing, election, or filing of a bond.

If the governing body adopts an ordinance in accordance with paragraph (b) or (c) of this subsection (4), the governing body shall give the district the corporate name specified in the petition by which, in all proceedings, it shall thereafter be known. The district shall be a public or quasi-municipal subdivision of this state and a body corporate with the limited proprietary powers set forth in this part 6.

Nothing in this subsection (4) authorizes a governing body to waive an election otherwise required under section 20 of article X and section 6 of article XI of the Colorado constitution or to hold an election inconsistent with the election requirements in said section 20.

If an ordinance is adopted establishing the district, such ordinance shall finally and conclusively establish the regular organization of the district against all persons unless an action attacking the validity of the organization is commenced in a court of competent jurisdiction within thirty days after the adoption of such ordinance. Thereafter, any such action shall be perpetually barred. The organization of said district shall not be directly or collaterally questioned in any suit, action, or proceeding.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1204, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 84:

(3.5) added and (4) amended, p. 840, § 6, effective March 29.

L. 99:

(1), (2), (3.5), and (4) amended, p. 521, § 22, effective April 30.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-25-607 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-25-608. Recording of ordinance.

Within thirty days after the district has been declared duly organized, the clerk of the governing body shall transmit for recording to the county clerk and recorder in each of the counties in which the district or a part thereof extends a copy of the ordinance establishing said district.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1204, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 83:

Entire section amended, p. 1227, § 9, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-25-608 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-25-609. Governing body constitutes board - duties.

The governing body of the municipality in which the district is located shall constitute ex officio the board of directors of the district. The presiding officer of the governing body shall be ex officio the presiding officer, the clerk of the governing body shall be ex officio the secretary, and the treasurer of the municipality shall be ex officio the treasurer of the board and district. The secretary and the treasurer may be one person. Such board shall adopt a seal. The secretary shall keep in a visual text format that may be transmitted electronically a record of all its proceedings, minutes of all meetings, certificates, contracts, and all corporate acts, which shall be open to inspection of all owners of property in the district, as well as to all other interested parties. The treasurer shall keep permanent records containing accurate accounts of all money received by and disbursed for and on behalf of the district.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1205, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (HB 09-1118), ch. 130, p. 562, § 7, effective August 5.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-25-609 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-25-610. Meetings.

The board shall hold meetings, on notice to each member of the board, which shall be open to the public in a place to be designated by the board as often as the needs of the district require. A quorum of the governing body shall constitute a quorum at any meeting.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1205, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-25-610 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-25-611. General powers of district.

The district has the following limited powers:

To have perpetual existence;

To have and use a corporate seal;

To sue and be sued and be a party to suits, actions, and proceedings;

To enter into contracts and agreements, except as otherwise provided in this part 6, affecting the affairs of the district, including contracts with the United States and any of its agencies or instrumentalities. Except in cases in which a district receives aid from an agency of the federal government, a notice shall be published for bids on all construction contracts for work or material or both involving an expense of one thousand dollars or more. The district may reject any and all bids, and, if it appears that the district can perform the work or secure material for less than the lowest bid, it may proceed so to do.

To borrow money and incur general obligation indebtedness and evidence the same by bonds, certificates, warrants, notes, and debentures and to issue revenue bonds or special assessment bonds in accordance with the provisions of this part 6;

To acquire, construct, install, operate, and maintain the improvements or provide the services contemplated by this part 6, as described in the petition or as later authorized by the voters of the district, including improvements located outside the boundaries of the district, and all property, rights, or interests incidental or appurtenant thereto and to dispose of real and personal property and any interest therein, including leases and easements in connection therewith;

To refund any general obligation indebtedness, revenue bonds, or special assessment bonds of the district without an election; otherwise, the terms and conditions of refunding bonds shall be substantially the same as those of an original issue of bonds of the district;

To have the management, control, and supervision of all the business and affairs of the district and of the acquisition, construction, installation, operation, and maintenance of district improvements or the provision of services;

To exercise the power of eminent domain and dominant eminent domain and, in the same manner provided by law for the condemnation of private property for public use, to take any property necessary to the exercise of the powers granted in this part 6;

To construct and install improvements across or along any public street, alley, or highway and to construct works across any stream of water or watercourses. However, the district shall promptly restore any such street or highway to its former state of usefulness as nearly as possible and shall not use the same in such manner as completely or unnecessarily to impair the usefulness thereof. The use and occupation of streets, alleys, and highways and the construction or installation of improvements by any district shall be in accordance with the provisions of all applicable municipal ordinances and with such reasonable rules and regulations as may be prescribed by the governing body of the municipality affected. Plans and specifications of proposed improvements shall be approved by the governing body of the municipality before construction or installation of improvements is commenced.

To fix and from time to time to increase or decrease rates, tolls, or charges for any revenue-producing services or facilities furnished by the district and to pledge such revenue for the payment of any indebtedness of the district. Until paid, all rates, tolls, or charges shall constitute a perpetual lien on and against the property served, and any such lien may be foreclosed in the same manner as provided by the laws of this state for the foreclosure of mechanics' liens. With respect to revenue-producing services or facilities, the board shall shut off or discontinue service for delinquencies in the payment of such rates, tolls, or charges or for delinquencies in the payment of taxes levied pursuant to this part 6 and shall prescribe and enforce rules and regulations for connecting with and disconnecting from such services and facilities.

To adopt and amend bylaws not in conflict with the constitution and laws of the state or with the ordinances of the municipality affected for carrying on the business, objects, and affairs of the board and of the district;

To exercise all rights and powers necessary or incidental to or implied from the specific powers granted in this part 6. Such specific powers shall not be considered as a limitation upon any power necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes and intent of this part 6.

To conduct an election in accordance with articles 1 to 13 of title 1, C.R.S., or article 10 of this title for any purpose the board deems necessary or required.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1205, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 84:

(1)(h) amended, p. 840, § 7, effective March 29.

L. 99:

(1)(e) to (1)(h) amended and (1)(n) added, p. 522, § 23, effective April 30.

L. 2004:

(1)(f) amended, p. 952, § 9, effective May 21.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-25-611 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-25-611.5. Special improvement districts - authority to establish.

In order to defray all or any portion of the costs of the improvements or services provided by the district, the board may establish special improvement districts within the boundaries of the district in accordance with part 5 of this article. Such special improvement districts may be established whenever the board determines that property in the district will be especially benefitted by such improvements or services. The method of creating special improvement districts, making the improvements or providing the services, and assessing the costs thereof shall be as provided in part 5 of this article. However, the electors eligible to vote on any question under this section shall either be electors of the district or electors within the local improvement district, as determined by the board. In addition, the board shall perform the duties of the governing body set forth in part 5 of this article, and the secretary of the district shall perform the duties of the clerk set forth in part 5 of this article. The improvements that the special improvement district may construct and the services that the special improvement district may provide shall be the improvements and services that the district may provide pursuant to this part 6.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire section added, p. 523, § 24, effective April 30.

31-25-612. Power to levy taxes.

In addition to the other means of providing revenue for such districts, the board has the power to levy and collect ad valorem taxes on and against all taxable property within the district. Such power shall not prevent the issuance of obligations payable solely from the income of revenue-producing facilities.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1206, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-25-612 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-25-613. Determining and fixing rate of levy.

The board shall determine the amount of money necessary to be raised by a levy on the taxable property in the district, taking into consideration other sources of revenue of the district, and shall fix a rate of levy which, when levied upon every dollar of the valuation for assessment of taxable property within the district and with other revenues, shall raise the amount required by the district during the ensuing fiscal year to supply funds for paying expenses of organization and the costs of acquiring, constructing, installing, operating, and maintaining the improvements or works of the district or providing the services of the district and promptly to pay in full when due all interest on and principal of general obligation bonds, indebtedness, and other obligations of the district. In the event of accruing defaults or deficiencies, additional levies may be made as provided in section 31-25-614. In accordance with the schedule prescribed by section 39-5-128, C.R.S., the board shall certify to the board of county commissioners of each county in which the district or a portion thereof lies the rate so fixed in order that, at the time and in the manner required by law for the levying of taxes, such board of county commissioners shall levy such tax upon the valuation for assessment of all taxable property within the district.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1206, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 87:

Entire section amended, p. 1407, § 3, effective April 4.

L. 99:

Entire section amended, p. 523, § 25, effective April 30.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-25-613 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-25-614. Levies to cover deficiencies.

The board, in certifying annual levies, shall take into account the maturing indebtedness for the current and ensuing year as provided in its contracts, maturing bonds, and interest on bonds, and deficiencies and defaults of prior years, and shall make ample provision for the payment thereof. In case the moneys produced from such levies, together with other revenues of the district, are not sufficient to punctually pay the annual installments on its contracts or bonds and interest thereon and to pay defaults and deficiencies, the board, from year to year, shall make such additional levies of taxes as may be necessary for such purposes, and, notwithstanding any limitations, such taxes shall be made and continue to be levied until the indebtedness of the district is fully paid.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1207, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-25-614 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-25-615. County officers to levy and collect taxes - lien.

It is the duty of the body having authority to levy taxes within such county to levy the taxes certified to it as provided in this part 6. It is the duty of all officials charged with the duty of collecting taxes to collect and enforce such taxes at the time and in the form and manner and with like interest and penalties as other taxes are collected and, when collected, to pay the same to the district ordering its levy and collection. The payment of such collections shall be made monthly to the treasurer of the district and paid into the depository thereof to the credit of the district. All taxes levied under this part 6, together with interest thereon and penalties for default in payment thereof, and all costs of collecting the same shall constitute a lien, until paid, on and against the property taxed, and such lien shall be a lien as for all other general taxes.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1207, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-25-615 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-25-616. Property sold for taxes.

The taxes provided in this part 6 shall be included as a part of general taxes and shall be paid accordingly. Upon sale of properties for delinquencies, sales shall be in the manner provided by the statutes of this state for selling property for nonpayment of taxes.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1207, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-25-616 as it existed prior to 1975.

Cross references:

For the sale of tax liens, see article 11 of title 39.

31-25-617. Reserve fund.

When any indebtedness has been incurred by a district, it is lawful for the board to levy taxes and collect revenue for the purpose of creating a reserve fund in such amount as the board may determine which may be used to meet the obligations of the district for operating charges and depreciation and to provide extensions of and betterments to the improvements of the district.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1207, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-25-617 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-25-618. Inclusion or exclusion - petition - notice - hearing - order.

The boundaries of any district organized under the provisions of this part 6 may be changed in the manner prescribed in this section, but the change of boundaries of the district shall not impair or affect its organization or its rights in or to property or any of its rights or privileges whatsoever nor shall it affect or impair or discharge any contract, obligation, lien, or charge for or upon which the district might be liable or chargeable had any such change of boundaries not been made. The owners of property proposed to be included or excluded may file with the board a petition, in writing, requesting that such property be included in or excluded from the district. The petition shall describe the property owned by the petitioners and shall be verified. The petition shall be accompanied by a deposit of moneys sufficient to pay all costs of the inclusion or exclusion proceedings. The secretary of the board shall cause notice of filing of such petition to be given and published, which notice shall state the filing of such petition, names of petitioners, descriptions of property sought to be included or excluded, and the request of said petitioners.

Such notice shall notify all persons having objections to appear at the office of the board at the time stated in said notice and show cause why the petition should not be granted. The board, at the time and place mentioned or at such times to which the hearing may be adjourned, shall proceed to hear the petition and all objections thereto which may be presented by any person showing cause why said petition should not be granted. The failure of any person interested to show cause shall be deemed as an assent on his part to the inclusion or exclusion of such property as requested for in the petition. If the petition is granted, the board shall adopt an ordinance to that effect and file a certified copy of the same with the county clerk and recorder of the county in which the property is located. Thereupon said property shall be included or excluded from the district.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1207, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-25-618 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-25-619. Liability of property.

All property included within or excluded from a district shall thereafter be subject to the levy of taxes for the payment of its proportionate share of any indebtedness of the district outstanding at the time of inclusion or exclusion.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1208, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-25-619 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-25-620. Board can issue bonds - form.

To carry out the purposes of this part 6, the board is hereby authorized pursuant to a duly adopted ordinance to issue bonds of the district. Such bonds shall bear interest at a rate such that the net effective interest rate of the issue of bonds does not exceed the maximum net effective interest rate authorized, payable at such times as determined by the board, and shall be due and payable in installments at such times as determined by the board extending not more than twenty years from date of issuance. The form and terms of said bonds, including provisions for their sale, payment, and redemption, shall be determined by the board. To the extent required by section 20 of article X of the Colorado constitution, such bonds shall not be issued unless first approved at an election held for that purpose in accordance with articles 1 to 13 of title 1, C.R.S., or article 10 of this title. If the board so determines, such bonds may be redeemable prior to maturity, with or without payment of a premium, but no premium shall exceed three percent of the principal thereof. The bonds shall be executed in the name of and on behalf of the district and signed by the presiding officer of the board with the seal of the district affixed thereto and attested by the secretary of the board. Such bonds shall be in such denominations as the board shall determine. Interest coupons, if any, shall bear the original or facsimile signature of the presiding officer of the board. Under no circumstances shall any of said bonds be held to be an indebtedness, obligation, or liability of the municipalities or counties in which the district is located, and bonds issued pursuant to the provisions of this part 6 shall contain a statement to that effect.

As used in this part 6, "net effective interest rate" means the net interest cost of securities divided by the sum of the products derived by multiplying the principal amount of the securities maturing on each maturity date by the number of years from their date to their respective maturities. In all cases, net effective interest rate shall be computed without regard to any option of redemption prior to the designated maturity dates of the securities.

For the purpose of determining the net effective interest rate, "net interest cost" means the total amount of interest to accrue on securities from their date to their respective maturities, less the amount of any premium above par, or plus the amount of any discount below par, at which said bonds are being or have been sold. In all cases net interest cost shall be computed without regard to any option of redemption prior to the designated maturity dates of the securities.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1208, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 84:

(1) amended, p. 841, § 8, effective March 29.

L. 99:

(1) amended, p. 524, § 26, effective April 30.

L. 2002:

(1) amended, p. 277, § 20, effective August 7.

Editor's note:

The provisions of this section are similar to provisions of several former sections as they existed prior to 1975. For a detailed comparison, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

31-25-621. Submission of debt question - ordinance. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1209, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

(1) amended, p. 1616, § 18, effective July 1.

L. 99:

Entire section repealed, p. 526, § 28, effective April 30.

Editor's note:

This section was similar to former § 31-25-621 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-25-622. Notice of election. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1209, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 99:

Entire section repealed, p. 526, § 28, effective April 30.

Editor's note:

This section was similar to former § 31-25-622 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-25-623. Conduct of election - canvass. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1209, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 1616, § 19, effective July 1.

L. 99:

Entire section repealed, p. 526, § 28, effective April 30.

Editor's note:

This section was similar to former § 31-25-623 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-25-624. Effect - subsequent elections. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1210, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 1616, § 20, effective July 1.

L. 84:

Entire section amended, p. 841, § 9, effective March 29.

L. 99:

Entire section repealed, p. 526, § 28, effective April 30.

Editor's note:

This section was similar to former § 31-25-624 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-25-625. Procedure.

Any district organized pursuant to this part 6 may be dissolved after notice is given and a hearing held in the manner prescribed by sections 31-25-606 and 31-25-607. After hearing any protests against or objections to dissolution, if the board determines that it is for the best interests of all concerned to dissolve the district, it shall so provide by an effective ordinance, a certified copy of which shall be filed in the office of the county clerk and recorder in each of the counties in which the district or part thereof is located. Upon such filing, the dissolution shall be complete. However, no district shall be dissolved until it has satisfied or paid in full all of its outstanding indebtedness, obligations, and liabilities or until funds are on deposit and available therefor.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1210, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-25-625 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-25-626. Correction of faulty notices.

In any case where a notice is provided for in this part 6, if the governing body finds for any reason that due notice was not given, the governing body shall not thereby lose jurisdiction and the proceeding in question shall not thereby be void or be abated, but the governing body, in that case, shall order due notice given and shall continue the proceeding until such time as notice is properly given and thereupon shall proceed as though notice had been properly given in the first instance.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1210, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-25-626 as it existed prior to 1975.